Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 3 Arbitration

10-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be referred to as “The Arbitration Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-1

.

10-3-2.
Agreements to arbitrate subject to chapter.

When clearly written and expressed, a provision in a written contract to settle by arbitration a controversy thereafter arising out of such contract, or out of the refusal to perform the whole or any part thereof, or an agreement in writing between two (2) or more persons to submit to arbitration any controversy existing between them at the time of the agreement to submit shall be valid, irrevocable, and enforceable, save upon such grounds as exist at law or in equity for the revocation of any contract; provided, however, that the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to collective contracts between employers and employees, or between employers and associations of employees, in respect to terms or conditions of employment; and provided further, that in all contracts of primary insurance, wherein the provision for arbitration is not placed immediately before the testimonium clause or the signature of the parties, the arbitration procedure may be enforced at the option of the insured, and in the event the insured exercises the option to arbitrate, then the provisions of this chapter shall apply and be the exclusive remedy available to the insured.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-2

; P.L. 1974, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 275, § 1.

10-3-3.
Stay of actions on issues referable to arbitration.

If any suit or proceeding be brought upon any issue referable to arbitration under an agreement in writing for arbitration, the court in which the suit is pending, upon being satisfied that the issue involved in the suit or proceeding is referable to arbitration under such an agreement, shall, on application of one of the parties, stay the trial of the action until the arbitration has been had in accordance with the terms of the agreement, providing the applicant for the stay is not in default in proceeding with the arbitration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-3

.

10-3-4.
Petition for arbitration — Service, hearing, and reference.

The party aggrieved by the alleged failure, neglect, or refusal of another to perform under a written agreement for arbitration may petition the superior court for the county in which any of the parties reside or has his or her place of business for an order directing that the arbitration proceed in the manner provided for in the agreement. Five (5) days’ notice in writing of the application shall be served upon the party in default. Service thereof shall be made in the manner provided by law for the service of a writ of summons. The court shall hear the parties, and upon being satisfied that the making of the agreement for arbitration or the failure to comply therewith is not in issue, the court shall make an order directing the parties to proceed to arbitration in accordance with the terms of the agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-4

.

10-3-5.
Determination as to whether issue is subject to arbitration.

If the making of the arbitration agreement or the failure, neglect, or refusal to perform the arbitration agreement is in issue, the court shall proceed summarily to the trial thereof. If no jury trial be demanded, the court shall hear and determine the issue. Where such an issue is raised, either party may, on or before the return day of the notice of application, demand a jury trial of the issue, and upon the demand of a jury trial the court shall make an order referring the issue or issues to a jury as in equity causes. If the jury finds that no agreement in writing for arbitration was made, or that there is no default in proceeding thereunder, the proceeding shall be dismissed. If the jury finds that an agreement for arbitration was made in writing and that there is a default in proceeding thereunder, the court shall make an order summarily directing the parties to proceed with the arbitration in accordance with the terms thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-5

.

10-3-6.
Judicial appointment of arbitrators.

If, in the agreement, provision is made for a method of naming or appointing an arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire, the method shall be followed; but if no method is provided in the agreement, or if a method is provided and any party thereto shall fail to avail himself or herself of such method, or if for any other reason there shall be a lapse in the naming of an arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire, or in filling a vacancy, then, upon the application of either party to the controversy, the court, as described in §

10-3-4

, shall designate and appoint an arbitrator or arbitrators or umpire, as the case may require, who shall act under the agreement with the same force and effect as if he, she, or they had been specifically named in the agreement; and, unless otherwise provided in the agreement, the arbitration shall be by a single arbitrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 27.

10-3-7.
Manner of making and hearing applications.

Any application to the court under this chapter shall be made and heard in the manner provided by law for the making and hearing of motions, except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 93.

10-3-8.
Arbitrators’ hearing — Summons of witnesses.

When more than one arbitrator is agreed to, all the arbitrators shall sit at the hearing of the case, unless, by consent in writing, all parties shall agree to proceed with the hearing with a less number. The arbitrators selected either as prescribed in this chapter or otherwise, or a majority of them, may summon in writing any person, to attend before them or any of them as a witness, and in a proper case to bring with him, her, or them any book, record, document or paper, which may be deemed material as evidence in the case. The fees for such attendance shall be the same as the fees of witnesses in the superior court. The summons shall issue in the name of the arbitrator or arbitrators, or a majority of them, and shall be signed by the arbitrator or arbitrators, or a majority of them, and shall be directed to the person to be summoned and shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas to appear and testify before superior court. If any person or persons, so summoned to testify, shall refuse or neglect to obey the summons, upon petition the court may compel the attendance of the person or persons before the arbitrator or arbitrators or punish the person or persons for contempt, in the same manner now provided for securing the attendance of witnesses or their punishment for neglect or refusal to attend superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 93.

10-3-9.
Taking of depositions.

Upon petition, approved by the arbitrators or by a majority of them, the superior court may direct the taking of depositions to be used as evidence before the arbitrators, in the same manner and for the same reasons as provided by law for the taking of depositions in suits or proceedings pending in superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-9

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 93.

10-3-10.
Form and signature of arbitrators’ award.

The award must be in writing and must be signed by the arbitrators or by a majority of them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-10

.

10-3-11.
Order confirming award.

At any time within one year after the award is made, any party to the arbitration may apply to the court for an order confirming the award, and thereupon the court must grant the order confirming the award unless the award is vacated, modified or corrected, as prescribed in §§

10-3-12

—

10-3-14

. Notice in writing of the application shall be served upon the adverse party or his or her attorney ten (10) days before the hearing on the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-11

; P.L. 1989, ch. 145, § 1.

10-3-12.
Grounds for vacating award.

In any of the following cases, the court must make an order vacating the award upon the application of any party to the arbitration:

Where the award was procured by corruption, fraud or undue means.

Where there was evident partiality or corruption on the part of the arbitrators, or either of them.

Where the arbitrators were guilty of misconduct in refusing to postpone the hearing, upon sufficient cause shown, or in hearing legally immaterial evidence, or refusing to hear evidence pertinent and material to the controversy, or of any other misbehavior by which the rights of any party have been substantially prejudiced.

Where the arbitrators exceeded their powers, or so imperfectly executed them that a mutual, final, and definite award upon the subject matter submitted was not made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-12

.

Partiality of Arbitrator.

Where it was not shown that the trial justice clearly erred by finding that the defendant failed to meet its burden of showing that an arbitrator was evidently partial to the plaintiff or that he refused to hear pertinent evidence concerning the plaintiff’s mitigation of damages, the confirmation of the arbitration award was affirmed. Taylor v. Delta Elec. Power, Inc., 741 A.2d 265,

1999 R.I. LEXIS 218

(R.I. 1999).

Arbitrator had no knowledge that a partner in the arbitrator’s law firm was the brother of a partner in a law firm that represented one of the parties that appeared before the arbitrator, and the state supreme court declined to find that the arbitrator’s award was suspect because the arbitrator had constructive knowledge of the relationship, found that the relationship was insignificant and would not have been grounds for disqualifying the arbitrator even if the arbitrator had known about it, and affirmed the trial court’s judgment confirming the arbitrator’s award. V.S. Haseotes & Sons, L.P., by & Through Bentas v. Haseotes, 819 A.2d 1281,

2003 R.I. LEXIS 95

(R.I. 2003).

Granting summary judgment for an insured and vacating an arbitration award, based on the ground that a situation of “evident partiality” under

R.I. Gen. Laws

§

10-3-12(2)

existed in the arbitration proceeding, was not error in view of the undisclosed fact that an insurance provider’s arbitrator was also its attorney in other matters; a court was required to vacate an award when there was evident partiality, and evident partiality was shown, given that the insurer’s arbitrator and the neutral arbitrator had assessed the insured’s damages at $45,000 and the insured’s arbitrator had assessed them at $636,000. The attorney-client relationship might well have had an undue influence on the neutral arbitrator, and the attorney-client relationship also gave rise to a rebuttable presumption, which was not rebutted, that there was a causal nexus between the conduct of the provider’s arbitrator and the majority’s low assessment of damages. McGinity v. Pawtucket Mut. Ins. Co., 899 A.2d 504,

2006 R.I. LEXIS 108

(R.I. 2006).

In seeking to vacate an arbitration award, an insured satisfied the test of Aetna Casualty & Surety Co. v. Grabbert, 590 A.2d 88, that an evident partiality under

R.I. Gen. Laws

§

10-3-12(2)

existed in an arbitration proceeding. The insured showed that his insurer’s arbitrator did not disclose that he or she was also the insurer’s attorney in other matters, and the insured showed that there was a causal nexus between the party-appointed arbitrator’s improper conduct and the award that was ultimately decided on. McGinity v. Pawtucket Mut. Ins. Co., 899 A.2d 504,

2006 R.I. LEXIS 108

(R.I. 2006).

10-3-13.
Rehearing after vacation of award.

Where an award is vacated, and the time within which the agreement required the award to be made has not expired, the court may, in its discretion, direct a rehearing by the arbitrators.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-13

.

10-3-14.
Modification or correction of award.

In any of the following cases, the court must make an order modifying or correcting the award, upon the application of any party to the arbitration:

Where there was an evident material miscalculation of figures, or an evident material mistake in the description of any person, thing, or property referred to in the award.

Where the arbitrators have awarded upon a matter not submitted to them, unless it is a matter not affecting the merits of the decision upon the matters submitted.

Where the award is imperfect in matter of form not affecting the merits of the controversy.

The order must modify and correct the award, so as to effect the intent thereof and promote justice between the parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-14

.

10-3-15.
Notice of motion to vacate, modify, or correct award.

Notice of a motion to vacate, modify, or correct an award must be served upon the adverse party or his or her attorney within sixty (60) days after the award is filed or delivered, and before the award is confirmed, as prescribed by law for service of notice of a motion in an action at law. The court may make an order, to be served with the notice of the motion, staying the proceedings of the adverse party to enforce the award.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-16

; P.L. 1980, ch. 293, § 1.

10-3-16.
Judgment on award.

Upon the granting of an order confirming, modifying or correcting an award, judgment shall be entered in conformity with the award in the court within thirty (30) days, unless an appeal is taken as provided in this chapter, in which last case the order of the superior court shall pursue the mandate of the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-16

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 93.

10-3-17.
Papers filed for judgment.

Any party to a proceeding for an order confirming, modifying or correcting an award shall, when the order is entered, file with the clerk, for the entry of judgment thereon, the following papers:

The agreement, the selection or appointment, if any, of an additional arbitrator or umpire, and each written extension of the time, if any, within which to make the award.

The award.

Each notice, affidavit or other paper used upon an application to confirm, modify or correct the award, and a copy of each order of the court upon such an application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-17

.

10-3-18.
Effect of judgment.

The judgment so entered shall have the same force and effect, in all respects, as, and be subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in an action at law; and it may be enforced as if it has been rendered in an action at law in the court in which it is entered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-18

.

10-3-19.
Appeal to supreme court.

Any party aggrieved by any ruling or order made in any court proceeding as authorized in this chapter may obtain review as in any civil action, and upon the entry of any final order provided in §

10-3-3

, or an order confirming, modifying or vacating an award, he or she may appeal to the supreme court as provided for appeals in civil actions, and the supreme court shall make such orders in the premises as the rights of the parties and the ends of justice require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-19

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 49; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 93.

10-3-20.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter shall be declared unconstitutional or invalid, the unconstitutionality or invalidity shall in no way affect the validity of any other portion thereof which can be given reasonable effect without the part so declared unconstitutional or invalid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1408, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 475, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

10-3-20

.

10-3-21.
Sureties — Bound to arbitration award on construction contract.

If a contractor principal on a bond furnished to guarantee performance or payment on a construction contract and the claimant are parties to a written contract with a provision to submit to arbitration any controversy thereafter arising under the contract, the arbitration provisions shall apply to the surety for all disputes involving questions of the claimant’s right of recovery against the surety. Either the claimant, the contractor principal, or surety may demand arbitration in accordance with the written contract in one arbitration proceeding. The arbitration award shall decide all controversies subject to arbitration between the claimant, on the one hand, and the contractor principal and surety on the other hand, including all questions involving liability of the contractor principal and surety on the construction bond, but a claimant must file suit for recovery against the surety within the time limits set forth by law or by the terms of the bond when there are no applicable statutory provisions. The arbitration shall be in accordance with §

10-3-1

et seq. and the court shall enter judgment on the arbitration as provided in the agreement.

The arbitrator or arbitrators, if more than one, shall make findings of fact as to the compliance with the requirements for recovery against the surety, and those findings of fact shall be a part of the award binding on all parties to the arbitration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 93.